Utah statutes.
4-17-7.   Notice of noxious weeds to be published annually in county -- Notice to particular property owners to control noxious weeds -- Methods of prevention or control specified -- Failure to control noxious weeds considered public nuisance.

(1)  Each county weed control board before May 1 of each year shall post a general notice of the noxious weeds within the county in at least three public places within the county and publish the same notice on:

(a)  at least three occasions in a newspaper or other publication of general circulation within the county; and

(b)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(2)  If the county weed control board determines that particular property within the county requires prompt and definite attention to prevent or control noxious weeds, it shall serve the owner or the person in possession of the property, personally or by certified mail, a notice specifying when and what action is required to be taken on the property.  Methods of prevention or control may include definite systems of tillage, cropping, use of chemicals, and use of livestock.

(3)  An owner or person in possession of property who fails to take action to control or prevent the spread of noxious weeds as specified in the notice is maintaining a public nuisance.

